California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1468, Sec. 1.   Effective September 26, 1984.   Operative January 1, 1985, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1468.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.7.

As incidental to the exemption provided for in Section 6359, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of ice or dry ice used or employed in packing and shipping or transporting food products for human consumption when the food products are shipped or transported in intrastate, interstate, or foreign commerce by common carriers, contract carriers, or proprietary carriers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1045, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1985.   Operative January 1, 1986, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 1045.)
-------------------------------------------

6359.8.

When fruits or vegetables are shipped or transported in intrastate, interstate, or foreign commerce by common carriers, contract carriers, or proprietary carriers, as an incident to the exemption provided for in Section 6359, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, all of the following:

(a) Carbon dioxide used or employed in packing and shipping or transporting fruits or vegetables
 for human consumption, when those fruits or vegetables are not sold to the ultimate consumer in a package that contains the carbon dioxide.

(b) Any nonreturnable materials containing the carbon dioxide atmosphere.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 624, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 624.)
-------------------------------------------

6360.

Any organization formed and operated for charitable purposes and qualifying for the welfare exemption from property taxation under Section 214 is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part with respect to bracelets designed to commemorate American prisoners of war, which it distributes, whether or not a contribution is made to such organization, where the profits are used solely and exclusively in furtherance of the purposes of such organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1176.)
-------------------------------------------

6360.1.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, a “Buddy Poppy” or any other symbolic, impermanent lapel pin that memorializes United States military veterans killed in foreign wars of the United States, by any corporation established by the Congress of the United States pursuant to Chapter 2301 (commencing with Section 23101) of Title 36 of the United States Code, or any of that corporation’s subordinate state or territorial
 subdivisions, local chapters, posts, or auxiliaries.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 364, Sec. 1.4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

6361.

(a) Any organization listed or described in subdivision (b) is a consumer and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part, of food products, nonalcoholic beverages, or other tangible personal property made or produced by members of the organization provided, however, that the organization’s sales are made on an irregular or intermittent basis, and that the organization’s profits from those sales are used exclusively in furtherance of the purposes of the organization.

(b) For purposes of this section, “organization” includes any of the following:

(1) Any nonprofit organization which meets all of the following conditions: 

(A) The organization qualifies for tax-exempt status under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) The organization’s primary purpose is to provide a supervised program of competitive sports for youth, or to promote good citizenship in youth.

(C) The organization does not discriminate on the basis of race, sex, nationality, or religion.

(2) (A) Any youth group sponsored by or affiliated with a qualified educational institution, including, but not limited to, any student activity club,
 athletic group, or musical group.

(B) For purposes of this section, “qualified educational institution” means any of the following:

(i) Any public elementary, secondary, or vocational-technical school providing education for kindergarten, grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and college undergraduate programs, or any part thereof, operated by state or local government.

(ii) Any nonprofit private educational institution providing education for kindergarten, grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and college undergraduate programs, or any part thereof, that meets the requirements of the State Department of Education for a school. “Private educational institution” means any entity providing education which satisfies the requirements of state and local laws pertaining to private educational institutions in effect on January 1, 1990, and which
 does not discriminate on the basis of race, sex, nationality, or religion.

(3) Little League, Bobby Sox, Boy Scouts, Cub Scouts, Girl Scouts, Campfire, Inc., Young Men’s Christian Association, Young Women’s Christian Association, Future Farmers of America, Future Homemakers of America, 4-H Clubs, Distributive Education Clubs of America, Future Business Leaders of America, Vocational Industrial Clubs of America, Collegiate Young Farmers, Boys’ Clubs, Girls’ Clubs, Special Olympics, Inc., American Youth Soccer Organization, California Youth Soccer Association, North, California Youth Soccer Association, South, and Pop Warner football.

(c) For purposes of this section, “irregular or intermittent” means associated directly with a particular event, such as fairs, galas, parades, scout-a-ramas, games, and similar activities. That term includes refreshment stands or booths that are
 utilized at scheduled events of organized leagues, but does not include storefront or mobile retail outlets which ordinarily require local business licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 116, Sec. 1.   Effective June 1, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

6361.1.

(a) Any qualified organization is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer of, tangible personal property if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The tangible personal property is of a handcrafted or artistic nature and is designed, created, or made by either individuals with developmental disabilities or children with severe emotional disturbances who are members of, or receive services from, the qualified organization.

(2) The price of each item of tangible personal property sold does not exceed twenty dollars ($20).

(3) The qualified organization’s sales are made on an irregular or intermittent basis.

(4) The qualified organization’s profits from the sales are used exclusively in furtherance of the purposes of the organization.

(b) For purposes of this section, “qualified organization” means any organization that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The organization is exempt from taxation pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of Section 501 of Title 26 of the United States Code.

(2) The primary purpose of the organization is to
 provide services to either individuals with developmental disabilities or children with severe emotional disturbances.

(3) The organization does not discriminate on the basis of race, sex, nationality, or religion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 323.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

6361.5.

Any public or private school, school district, county office of education, or student organization is a consumer of, and shall not be considered a retailer within the provisions of this part with respect to yearbooks and catalogs prepared for or by it and distributed to students.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 205, Sec. 1.   Effective June 23, 1988.   Operative October 1, 1988, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 205.)
-------------------------------------------

6362.3.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of newspapers or periodicals, during the term of a prepaid subscription, if the subscription was entered into and paid for prior to July 15, 1991.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 236, Sec. 3.3.   Effective July 29, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

6362.4.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale or lease of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, the right to reproduce or copy a digital product in order for copies of the digital product to be distributed for consideration to third parties, even if a copy of the digital product is transferred concurrently with the granting of that right. Any tangible storage media on which the digital product is transferred is merely incidental.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 23, Sec. 15.   (SB 122)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6362.5.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale or lease of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, master tapes or master records embodying sound, except amounts subject to the taxes imposed by other provisions of this part paid by a customer in connection with the customer’s production of master tapes or master records to a recording studio for the tangible elements of such master records or master tapes.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Master tapes or master records embodying sound” means tapes, records, and other devices utilized by the recording industry in making recordings embodying sound.

(2) “Amounts paid for the furnishing of the tangible elements” shall not include any amounts paid for the copyrightable, artistic or intangible elements of such master tapes or master records, whether designated as royalties or otherwise including, but not limited to, services rendered in producing, fabricating, processing, or imprinting tangible personal property or any other services or production expenses in connection therewith which may otherwise be construed as constituting “sale” under Section 6006.

(3) “Recording studio” is a place where, by means of mechanical or electronic devices, voices, music, or other sounds are transmitted to tapes, records,
 or other devices capable of reproducing sound.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 951, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6362.7.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state, of tangible personal property which becomes an ingredient or component part of any newspaper or periodical that is distributed without charge and regularly issued at average intervals not exceeding three months, and any such newspaper or periodical.

(b) There are exempted from the taxes imposed
 by this part, the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state, of tangible personal property which becomes an ingredient or a component part of any periodical regularly issued at average intervals not exceeding three months, and any such periodical, that is sold by subscription and delivered by mail or common carrier.

(c) For purposes of this section, “periodical” means any publication that appears at stated intervals at least four times per year, but not more than 60 times per year, each issue of which contains news or information of general interest to the public, or to some particular organization or group of persons. Each issue must bear a relationship to prior or subsequent issues with respect to continuity of literary character or similarity of subject matter, and there must be some connection between the different issues of the series in the nature of the articles appearing in them. Each
 issue must be sufficiently similar in style and format to make it evident that it is one of a series. The term does not include printed sales messages, shopping guides, or other publications of which the advertising portion, including product publicity, exceeds 90 percent of the printed area of the entire issue in more than one-half of the issues during any 12-month period.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1991, 1st Ex., Ch. 9) by Stats. 1992, Ch. 903, Sec. 1.   Effective September 25, 1992.   Operative November 1, 1992, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 903.)
-------------------------------------------

6362.8.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state, of tangible personal property that becomes an ingredient or component part of any newspaper or periodical regularly issued at average intervals not exceeding three months, or any such newspaper or periodical.

(b) This section shall apply only with respect to any of the following:

(1) Any newspaper or periodical that is published or purchased by an organization that qualifies for tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and is distributed to the members of the organization in consideration of payment of the organization’s membership fee, or to the organization’s contributors.

(2) Any newspaper or periodical that is published by an organization that qualifies for tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and does not receive revenue from, or accept, any commercial advertising.

(3) Any newspaper or periodical distributed by a nonprofit organization for which both of the following apply:

(A) Distribution is to any member of the nonprofit organization in consideration, in whole
 or in part, of payment of the organization’s membership fee. 

(B) The amount paid or incurred by the nonprofit organization for the cost of printing the newspaper or periodical is less than 10 percent of the membership fee attributable to the period for which the newspaper or periodical is distributed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 903, Sec. 3.   Effective September 25, 1992.   Operative November 1, 1992, by Sec. 5 of Ch. 903.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, meals and food products for human consumption furnished or served to the students of a school by public or private schools, school districts, student organizations, parent-teacher associations, and any blind person (as defined in Section 19153 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) operating a restaurant or vending stand in an educational institution under Article 5 (commencing with Section 19625) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 10 of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code. The term “food products” as used in this section has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 6359.

The exemption provided by this section shall not apply when the meals or food products are sold for consumption within a place, the entrance to which is subject to an admission charge, except for national and state parks and monuments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1741, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.2.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, tangible personal property that is sold to a successful bidder at an auction that is conducted by, or affiliated with, a nonprofit organization, if the purpose of that auction is to obtain revenue for the funding of a shelter for homeless individuals and families and those revenues obtained are actually expended for that purpose. For purposes of this section, “nonprofit organization” means an
 organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 23701d. This section shall not apply to any sale at an auction that is conducted more than once during any 12-month period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 855, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1994.   Operative January 1, 1995, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 855.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.3.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, used pieces of clothing, household items, or other retail items sold by thrift stores operated by a nonprofit organization if the purpose of that thrift store is to obtain revenue for the funding of medical, hospice, or
 social services to chronically ill individuals, and at least 75 percent of the net income derived from operations of the thrift store are actually expended for the purpose of providing medical, hospice, or social services to the chronically ill.

(b) For purposes of this section, “nonprofit organization” means an organization that provides medical, hospice, or social services to individuals with a chronic, life-threatening illness, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1568.01 of the Health and Safety Code, and is exempt from taxation under Section 23701d.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 741, Sec. 1.   (SB 1484)   Effective September 23, 2018.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.4.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, tangible personal property sold by a thrift store located on a military installation and operated by a designated entity that, in partnership with the United States Department of Defense, provides financial, educational, and other assistance to members of the Armed Forces of the United States, eligible family members, and survivors that are in need.

(b) For purposes of this section, “designated entity” means a military welfare society described in Section 1033 of Chapter 53 of Part II of Subtitle A of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 225, Sec. 1.   (SB 1041)   Effective August 29, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.5.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use or other consumption in this state of, meals and food products for human consumption furnished or served by any religious organization at a social or other gathering conducted by it or under its auspices, if the purpose in furnishing or serving the meals and food products is to obtain revenue for the functions and activities of the organization and the revenue obtained from furnishing or serving the meals and food products is actually used in carrying on such functions and activities.

For the purposes of this section, “religious organization” means any organization the property of which is exempt from taxation pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 3 of Article XIII of the State Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1079.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.6.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, meals and food products for human consumption furnished or served to and consumed by residents or patients of the following:

(a) A health facility, as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, that holds the license required pursuant to Section 1253, or is exempt from the license requirement pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section
 1270, or is operated by the United States.

(b) A community care facility, as defined in Section 1502 of the Health and Safety Code, that holds the license required by Section 1508, or is a residential facility selected by a licensee pursuant to Section 1506 and exclusively used for the reception and care of persons placed by the licensee, or is exempt from the license requirement pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 1505, or is operated by the United States.

(c) A residential care facility for the elderly, as defined in Section 1569.2 of the Health and Safety Code, that holds the license required by Section 1569.10 of the Health and Safety Code or is exempt from the license requirements pursuant to Section 1569.145 of the Health and Safety Code, or is operated by the United States.

(d) Any house or institution
 supplying board and room for a flat monthly rate and serving as a principal residence exclusively for persons 62 years of age or older, and any housing that primarily serves older persons and that is financed by state or federal programs.

(e) An alcoholism recovery facility, as defined in Section 11834.02 of the Health and Safety Code, that holds the license required by Section 11834.30 of the Health and Safety Code. This subdivision shall apply to meals served by the facility on or after January 1, 1985.

(f) A drug abuse recovery or treatment facility, as defined in Section 11834.02 of the Health and Safety Code, that holds the license required by Section 11834.30 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 91, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.7.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, meals that are delivered to homebound elderly or disabled persons by a nonprofit volunteer home delivery meal provider.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 240, Sec. 1.   Effective August 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.8.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use or other consumption in this state of, meals and food products for human consumption that are furnished or served by any nonprofit veteran’s organization at a social or other gathering conducted by it or under its auspices, if the purpose in furnishing or serving the meals and food products is to obtain revenue for the functions and activities of the organization and the revenue obtained from furnishing or serving the
 meals and food products is actually used in carrying on those functions and activities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 721, Sec. 1.   Effective October 9, 2003.   Operative April 1, 2004, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 721.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.9.

On and after January 1, 2020, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, diapers designed, manufactured, processed, fabricated, or packaged for use by infants, toddlers, and children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 82, Sec. 2.   (AB 150)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6363.10.

(a) On and after January 1, 2020, there are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, menstrual hygiene products.

(b) For purposes of this section, “menstrual hygiene products” shall only include the following:

(1) Tampons.

(2) Sanitary napkins primarily designed and labeled for menstrual hygiene use.

(3) Menstrual sponges.

(4) Menstrual cups.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 82, Sec. 3.   (AB 150)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

6364.

There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of:

(a) Nonreturnable containers when sold without the contents to persons who place the contents in the container and sell the contents together with the container.

(b) Containers when sold with the contents if the sales price of the contents is
 not required to be included in the measure of the taxes imposed by this part.

(c) Returnable containers when sold with the contents in connection with a retail sale of the contents or when resold for refilling.

(d) Containers, when sold or leased without the contents to persons who place food products for human consumption in the container for shipment, provided the food products will be sold, whether in the same container or not, and whether the food products are remanufactured or repackaged prior to sale.

(e) For purposes of this section, “returnable containers” means containers of a kind customarily returned by the buyer of the contents for reuse. All other containers are “nonreturnable containers.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 758, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.   Operative April 1, 2000, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 758.)
-------------------------------------------

6364.5.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, any container used to collect or store human whole blood, plasma, blood products, or blood derivatives that are exempt from taxation pursuant to Section 33, including, but not limited to, blood collection units and blood pack units.

(b) For purposes of this section, “blood collection units” and “blood pack
 units” include all items that form an integral, interconnected package that, when sold to plasmapheresis centers and blood banks, are used to collect blood or blood components, which are then sold together with the bags and tubing in which they are contained. Blood pack units consist of a plastic bag or bags, tubing, and a needle. Blood collection units are either a manual system that includes a needle, multiple bags, a bag containing saline solution, tubing, filters, grommets, and a pooling bag or an automated system that consists of a needle, a bag of anticoagulant, tubing, a plastic bowl containing a stainless steel centrifuge and a pooling bag. Blood collection units and blood pack units also include plastic bags and tubing sold to plasmapheresis centers when those centers use them to collect blood plasma or platelets and then sell the plasma or platelets together with the bags and tubing in which they are contained.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 773, Sec. 1.   Effective October 8, 1997.   Operative April 1, 1998, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 773.)
-------------------------------------------

6365.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use or other consumption in this state of, original works of art, which are:

(1) Purchased by this state or any city, county, city and county, or other local governmental entity;

(2) Purchased by any nonprofit organization operating any public museum for, and pursuant to
 contract with, any such governmental entity;

(3) Purchased by any nonprofit organization which has qualified for exemption pursuant to Section 23701d for one or more museums regularly open to the public not less than 20 hours per week for not less than 35 weeks of the calendar year and operated by the purchaser of such art or operated by another nonprofit organization which has qualified for exemption pursuant to Section 23701d;

(4) Purchased for donation and actually donated by delivery by the retailer pursuant to the instructions of the buyer to any such governmental entity, or nonprofit organization, and evidenced by a written transfer of title from the buyer to such governmental entity or nonprofitorganization; or

(5) Leased from one nonprofit organization to another nonprofit organization for 35 years or more,
 if both the lessor and lessee are nonprofit organizations as defined in either paragraph (2) or (3).

(b) The exemption provided by this section shall apply only to works of art purchased to become part of the permanent collection of any of the following:

(1) A museum.

(2) A nonprofit corporation which has qualified for exemption pursuant to Section 23701d; regularly loans not less than 85 percent of the value of its collection of works of art to one or more museums; and is required by its articles of incorporation to loan its works of art and is otherwise prohibited by its articles from making any private use of its works of art; provided, that the work of art for which the exemption is claimed pursuant to this section shall actually be placed on display at one or more museums in California for not less than 24
 months during the three-year period commencing from the date of purchase.

(3) Any city, county, city and county, or other local governmental entity and this state which purchases, commissions, or leases from any such governmental entity public art for display to the public in buildings, parks, plazas, or other public places. These areas shall be open to the public not less than 20 hours per week for not less than 35 weeks of the calendar year.

(c) For purposes of this section, “work of art” means a work of visual art, including, but not limited to, a drawing, painting, mural, fresco, sculpture, mosaic, film, or photograph, a work of calligraphy, a work of graphic art (including, but not limited to, an etching, lithograph, offset print, silk screen, or a work of graphic art of like nature), crafts (including, but not limited to, crafts in clay, textile, fiber, wood, metal, plastic,
 glass, costume, dress, clothing, personal adornment, and like materials), or mixed media (including, but not limited to, a collage, assemblage, or any combination of the foregoing art media).

(d) For purposes of this section, a “museum” shall only include:

(1) A museum which has a significant portion of its space open to the public without charge;

(2) A museum open to the public without charge for not less than six hours during any month the museum is open to the public; or

(3) A museum which is open to a segment of the student or adult population without charge.

(e) For the purposes of this section, “permanent collection” as it applies to leases of original works of art, means a
 collection with a lease term of 35 years or more.

(f) Any public entity or nonprofit organization claiming an exemption pursuant to this section shall maintain records, in such forms as prescribed by the board, sufficient to substantiate its claim. Such records shall include, but not be limited to, the date of purchase, the purchase price, the date the property was first brought into this state, and the dates and locations the work of art was on display at a museum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 2006.   Operative January 1, 2007, by Sec. 3 of Ch. 281.)
-------------------------------------------

6366.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale in this state of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, the following:

(1) Aircraft sold to any person using the aircraft as a common carrier of persons or property under authority of the laws of this state, of the United States, or of any foreign government, or sold to any foreign government for use by that government outside of this state, or sold to any
 person who is not a resident of this state and who will not use that aircraft in this state otherwise than in the removal of the aircraft from this state.

(2) (A) A ground control station sold to any foreign government for use by that government outside of this state or sold to any person who is not a resident of this state and who will not use that ground control station in this state otherwise than in the removal of the ground control station from this state.

(B) A “ground control station” means a portable facility used to operate aircraft in the air without a pilot on board. The term includes controls, video equipment, computers, generators, and communications equipment, sold as an integral part of the station, and antennas used to control the aircraft. The term does not include trucks, tractor-trailers, or other devices solely used to transport the
 station.

(3) Tangible personal property that is purchased on or after October 1, 1996, and becomes a component part of any aircraft described in paragraph (1), as a result of the maintenance, repair, overhaul, or improvement of that aircraft in compliance with Federal Aviation Administration requirements, and any charges made for labor and services rendered with respect to that maintenance, repair, overhaul, or improvement.

(b) With respect to aircraft sold on or after January 1, 1997, it shall be presumed that a person is not engaged in business as a common carrier if the person’s yearly gross receipts from the use of the aircraft as a common carrier do not exceed 20 percent of the purchase cost of the aircraft to him or her, or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), whichever is less. This presumption may be rebutted by contrary evidence satisfactory to the board showing that the
 person is engaged in business as a common carrier.

In no event shall “gross receipts” include compensation by the person or related parties for use of the aircraft as a common carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6366.1.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of aircraft which are leased, or are sold to persons for the purpose of leasing, to lessees using such aircraft as common carriers of persons or property under authority of the laws of this state, of the United States or any foreign government, or to any foreign government as lessees for use by such government outside the state, or to persons as lessees who are not residents of this
 state and who will not use such aircraft in this state otherwise than in the removal of such aircraft from this state.

(b) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part, the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property sold to an aircraft manufacturer and incorporated into aircraft to be leased by the manufacturer under conditions set forth in subdivision (a) of this section.

(c) With respect to aircraft leased, or sold for the purpose of leasing, on or after January 1, 1997, it shall be presumed that the aircraft is not regularly used in the business of transporting for hire property or persons if the lessor’s yearly gross receipts from the lease of that aircraft to persons using the aircraft as common carriers of property or persons do not exceed 20 percent of the cost of the aircraft to the
 lessor, or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), whichever is less. This presumption may be rebutted by contrary evidence satisfactory to the board showing that the aircraft is regularly used as a common carrier of property or persons.

In no event shall “gross receipts” include compensation by the lessor or related parties for use of the aircraft as a common carrier.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6366.2.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of any new motor vehicle sold to a purchaser who is a resident of a foreign country and who arranges for the purchase through an authorized vehicle dealer in the foreign country prior to arriving in the United States, if the following conditions are met:

(1) The purchaser is issued an in-transit permit pursuant to Section 6700.1 of the Vehicle
 Code.

(2) Prior to the expiration of the in-transit permit issued to the purchaser, the retailer ships or drives the motor vehicle to a point outside the United States by means of facilities operated by the retailer, or by delivery to a carrier, customs broker or forwarding agent for shipment to that point.

(b) For purposes of this section, “carrier” means a person or firm engaged in the business of transporting for compensation tangible personal property owned by other persons, and includes both common and contract carriers. “Forwarding agent” means a person or firm engaged in the business of preparing property for shipment or arranging for its shipment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 762, Sec. 2.   Effective September 25, 1989.   Operative January 1, 1990, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 762.)
-------------------------------------------

6366.3.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of and the storage, use or other consumption in this state of tangible personal property purchased by the state or any local government entity as part of a public art collection which shall be considered a museum pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) or a nonprofit museum regularly open to the public which is operated by or for a local or state government entity, or operated by a nonprofit organization which has qualified for exemption pursuant to Section
 23701d, provided:

(1) The property is purchased to replace property which has been physically destroyed by fire, flood, earthquake, or other calamity;

(2) The property is purchased and used exclusively for display purposes within such museum; and

(3) The property is purchased within three years from the date the calamity occurred.

(b) The aggregate amount of the exemption provided by this section shall not exceed the value of the property destroyed on the date the calamity occurred.

(c) The exemption provided by this section extends only to items which have value as museum pieces and does not extend to display cases, shelving, lamps, lighting fixtures, or other items of tangible personal
 property utilized in the operation of a museum.

(d) For purposes of this section, a “museum” shall only include:

(1) A museum which has a significant portion of its space open to the public without charge; or

(2) A museum open to the public without charge for not less than six hours during any month the museum is open to the public; or

(3) A museum which is open to a segment of the student or adult population without charge; or

(4) A public art collection if that art work is on display in a space which is open to the public without charge.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1266, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 1987.   Operative January 1, 1988, by Sec. 4 of Ch. 1266.)
-------------------------------------------

6366.4.

(a) There are exempted from the taxes imposed by this part the gross receipts from the sale of, and the storage, use, or other consumption in this state of, tangible personal property purchased by a nonprofit museum regularly open to the public that is operated by or for a local or state government entity, or operated by a nonprofit organization which has qualified for exemption pursuant to Section 23701d,
 provided the property is purchased and used exclusively for display purposes within the museum.
